Utah statutes.
51-7-8.   Separate accounts for funds -- Credit of allocated shares of income and gains or losses.

The state treasurer shall keep for each fund for which investments are made, a separate account, to be designated by name and number, which shall record the individual amounts and the totals of all investments belonging to the fund, and shall credit to each fund not less often than quarterly its allocated share of the income from the investments of pooled funds, and gains or losses from the sale or exchange of pooled investment assets.

